Hawaii statutes.
§302A-806 Hawaii teacher standards board
special fund. There is established within the state treasury a special
fund to be known as the Hawaii teacher standards board special fund, into which
shall be deposited all moneys received by the board in the form of
appropriations, fees, fines, grants, donations, or revenues regardless of their
source. The special fund shall be administered by the department and used to
pay the expenses of the board, including but not limited to the payment of all
operational and personnel costs, and reimbursements to board members for travel
expenses incurred. [L 1996, c 89, pt of §2; am L 2001, c 312, pt of §10; am L
2002, c 178, §5]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next